dev/nouns.chopped.dix
<dictionary>
  <pardefs>
    <pardef n="mē/le__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lei</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lē</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>li</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ļu</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lēm</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lēs</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lēm</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lēm</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les</l>
          <r>le<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sir/ds__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dij</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dī</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ds</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žu</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīm</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dis</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīs</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīm</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dis</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīm</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dis</l>
          <r>ds<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sē/de__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dei</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dē</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>de</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>žu</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dēm</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dēs</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dēm</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dēm</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="abl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>des</l>
          <r>de<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="akmeņogle"><i>akmeņog</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="atbilde"><i>atbil</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="bilde"><i>bil</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="caurule"><i>cauru</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="datorspēle"><i>datorspē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="dekāde"><i>dekā</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="iestāde"><i>iestā</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="inde"><i>in</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izklaide"><i>izklai</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izstrāde"><i>izstrā</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izveide"><i>izvei</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="izvēle"><i>izvē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="katedrāle"><i>katedrā</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="ķēde"><i>ķē</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="kontrole"><i>kontro</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="locekle"><i>locek</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="lode"><i>lo</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="mēle"><i>mē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="metode"><i>meto</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="morāle"><i>morā</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="norāde"><i>norā</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pārbaude"><i>pārbau</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pārraide"><i>pārrai</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pārvalde"><i>pārval</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pasaule"><i>pasau</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pavēle"><i>pavē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pele"><i>pe</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="piegāde"><i>piegā</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="pludmale"><i>pludma</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="priede"><i>prie</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="puslode"><i>puslo</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="saule"><i>sau</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sēde"><i>sē</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sekunde"><i>sekun</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="sirds"><i>sir</i><par n="sir/ds__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="spēle"><i>spē</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="valde"><i>val</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vēstule"><i>vēstu</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="vide"><i>vi</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zāle"><i>zā</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="zonde"><i>zon</i><par n="sē/de__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="Konstantinopole"><i>Konstantinopo</i><par n="mē/le__n_f"/></e>
